Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB626.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Beginning with academic year 2026-2027, each local school board shall include
at least one (1) student representative to attend and participate in school board
meetings, provide student perspective on issues, and learn about school district
governance.
(2) A student representative shall:
(a) Be enrolled in a public high school in the district;
(b) Be classified as a junior or senior at the time of appointment;
(c) Have completed the requirement of KRS 158.141(1); and
(d) Serve at least a one (1) year term.
(3) Each local school board shall adopt a policy to implement this section that
includes but is not limited to the student representative selection process,
eligibility requirements, and terms of service. The policy shall include the
following provisions:
(a) A student representative selection process shall include voting by high
school students;
(b) An attendance policy that allows a student representative to miss a
maximum of two (2) meetings;
(c) Permit a student representative to use video teleconferencing in meetings in
the same manner as other members of the local board under KRS 61.805 to
61.850;
(d) A student representative shall not be a voting member but shall be allowed
to provide a nonbinding advisory vote on action items that is recorded in the
minutes of the meeting;
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1895
(e) A student representative shall not participate in executive or closed sessions
of a school board meeting; and
(f) A student representative shall be afforded full participation in school board
meetings the same as other school board members, except as described in
paragraphs (d) and (e) of this subsection.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:31 AM Jacketed